Utah statutes.
76-6-507.   Deceptive business practices -- Definitions -- Defense.

(1)  A person is guilty of a class B misdemeanor if, in the course of business, he:

(a)  uses or possesses for use a false weight or measure, or any other device for falsely determining or recording any quality or quantity;

(b)  takes or attempts to take more than the represented quantity of any commodity or service when as buyer he furnishes the weight or measure; or

(c)  sells, offers, or exposes for sale adulterated or mislabeled commodities.

(2) (a)  "Adulterated" means varying from the standard of composition or quality prescribed, or pursuant to any statute providing criminal penalties for a variance, or set by established commercial usage.

(b)  "Mislabeled" means varying from the standard of truth or disclosure in labeling prescribed by or pursuant to any statute providing criminal penalties for a variance, or set by established commercial usage.

(3)  It is an affirmative defense to prosecution under this section that the defendant's conduct was not knowing or reckless.

